Virginia statutes. Title 8.9A. Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.
Short Title, Definitions and General Concepts.
§ 8.9A-106.
Control of investment property.

Control under §

8.8A-106

. A person has control of a certificated security, uncertificated security, or security entitlement as provided in §

8.8A-106

.

Control of commodity contract. A secured party has control of a commodity contract if:

the secured party is the commodity intermediary with which the commodity contract is carried; or

the commodity customer, secured party, and commodity intermediary have agreed that the commodity intermediary will apply any value distributed on account of the commodity contract as directed by the secured party without further consent by the commodity customer.

Effect of control of securities account or commodity account. A secured party having control of all security entitlements or commodity contracts carried in a securities account or commodity account has control over the securities account or commodity account.

History.

1996, c. 216, §§ 8.8-106, 8.9-115; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments for the Benefit of Creditors, § 33; 2A M.J. Attachment and Garnishment, § 62; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 100.2, 101.1.

§ 8.9A-107.
Control of letter-of-credit right.

A secured party has control of a letter-of-credit right to the extent of any right to payment or performance by the issuer or any nominated person if the issuer or nominated person has consented to an assignment of proceeds of the letter of credit under subsection (c) of §

8.5A-114

or otherwise applicable law or practice.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments for the Benefit of Creditors, § 33; 2A M.J. Attachment and Garnishment, § 62; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 100.2, 101.1.

§ 8.9A-108.
Sufficiency of description.

Sufficiency of description. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c), (d), and (e), a description of personal or real property is sufficient, whether or not it is specific, if it reasonably identifies what is described.

Examples of reasonable identification. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), a description of collateral reasonably identifies the collateral if it identifies the collateral by:

specific listing;

category;

except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), a type of collateral defined in the Uniform Commercial Code;

quantity;

computational or allocational formula or procedure; or

except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), any other method, if the identity of the collateral is objectively determinable.

Supergeneric description not sufficient. A description of collateral as “all the debtor’s assets” or “all the debtor’s personal property” or using words of similar import does not reasonably identify the collateral.

Investment property. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), a description of a security entitlement, securities account, or commodity account is sufficient if it describes:

the collateral by those terms or as investment property; or

the underlying financial asset or commodity contract.

When description by type insufficient. A description only by type of collateral defined in the Uniform Commercial Code is an insufficient description of:

a commercial tort claim; or

in a consumer transaction, consumer goods, a security entitlement, a securities account, or a commodity account.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-110; 1996, c. 216, § 8.9-115; 2000, c. 1007.